Hawaii statutes.
§379-1 Definitions. The term
"labor disputes" includes any controversy concerning terms, tenure,
or conditions of employment, or concerning the association or representation of
persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange
terms or conditions of employment, regardless of whether the disputants stand
in the proximate relation of employer and employee. [L 1967, c 18, pt of §2;
HRS §379-1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next